Washington statutes.
RCW 43.133.040

Sunrise notes—Contents.

Sunrise notes shall include:

(1) The purpose and expected impact of the new board or special purpose district;

(2) The powers and duties of the new board or special purpose district;

(3) The direct or potential duplication of the powers and duties of existing boards or special purpose districts; and

(4) Other information relevant to the need for the new board or special purpose district.

[ 1987 c 342 s 4.]